Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-616
Altering identification number; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of altering an identification number if, with the intent to deceive or harm, he obscures an identification number or in the course of business he sells, offers for sale, leases or otherwise disposes of an article knowing that an identification number thereon is obscured.

(2) Altering an identification number is a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 138.